District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-906

Articles of incorporation — Procedure for filing and recordation; effect of certificate; quo warranto proceedings not precluded.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 482, ch. 397, § 6
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-906.
1981 Ed., § 29-1106.
1973 Ed., § 29-806.